Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2154YC (4) 91 da/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 466B.51 Definitions. 1 As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 1. âCommercial fertilizerâ means the same as defined in 4 section 200.3. 5 2. âCommercial nitrogen-based fertilizerâ means a commercial 6 fertilizer containing at least twenty-five percent total 7 nitrogen. 8 3. âDepartmentâ means the department of agriculture and land 9 stewardship. 10 4. âQualifying crop production productâ means a commercially 11 available product that, when applied to cropland in conjunction 12 with or as an alternative to a commercial fertilizer, 13 cost-effectively promotes optimum plant growth in a manner that 14 best reduces nitrogen as a nonpoint source of water pollution. 15 5. âSoil conditionerâ means the same as defined in section 16 200.3. 17 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 466B.52 Commercial fertilizer study. 18 1. The department shall develop, implement, and administer 19 a commercial fertilizer study. The purpose of the study is 20 to determine innovations that may be practically incorporated 21 as part of crop production practices that reduce the average 22 statewide per-cropland-acre use of commercial nitrogen-based 23 fertilizers by the lesser of fifteen percent of the total 24 nitrogen applied, or thirty pounds, using one or more historic 25 baselines established by the department. The department 26 may contract with another party to develop, implement, and 27 administer any part of the study subject to the departmentâs 28 direction and supervision. 29 2. The department shall examine qualifying crop production 30 products, including but not limited to soil conditioners with 31 nitrogen-fixing properties, biological sources of nitrogen, 32 and other biofertilizers that improve nitrogen management 33 practices. 34 3. The study shall be conducted with the participation of 35 -1- LSB 2154YC (4) 91 da/ns 1/ 4 H.F. _____ crop producers selected from diverse areas of the state who 1 agree to set aside a limited number of crop acres for four crop 2 years. For each crop year, the department shall reimburse the 3 participating crop producer not less than five dollars per 4 acre for each crop year, subject to an annual adjustment for 5 inflation. 6 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 466B.53 Report. 7 The department shall prepare a preliminary report and 8 final report regarding its efforts to develop, implement, and 9 administer the study. Each report must include information 10 regarding the extent to which crop producers are participating 11 in the study and the extent to which the purpose of the 12 study is being achieved. Each report must identify the best 13 qualifying crop production products for corn and soybeans. 14 The department shall deliver the preliminary report to the 15 governor and general assembly not later than January 15, 2028, 16 and shall deliver the final report to the governor and general 17 assembly not later than January 15, 2031. Each report shall 18 not identify an individual study participant or specific 19 agricultural land. 20 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 466B.54 Confidentiality. 21 Any information received, collected, or held under this 22 subchapter is a confidential record as provided in section 23 22.7, if the information identifies any of the following: 24 1. A person who holds a legal interest in the cropland 25 used in conducting the study under this subchapter or who has 26 previously held a legal interest in that cropland. 27 2. A person who is involved in managing the cropland used 28 in conducting the study under this subchapter or who has 29 previously managed that cropland. 30 3. The identifiable location of the cropland used in 31 conducting this study. 32 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 466B.55 Conditional implementation. 33 The department is not required to implement this subchapter 34 unless the general assembly appropriates moneys to the 35 -2- LSB 2154YC (4) 91 da/ns 2/ 4 H.F. _____ department for that purpose. 1 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 466B.56 Repeal. 2 This subchapter is repealed July 1, 2031. 3